Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.310

Annual report.

Every association subject to this chapter shall deliver an annual report to the secretary of state in accordance with RCW 23.95.255.

[ 2015 c 176 s 9109; 1989 c 307 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.